Rhode Island statutes. Title 30 Military Affairs and Defense
Chapter 29 Committee on Naval Affairs

30-29-1.
Permanent committee — Composition.

There is hereby created a permanent committee on naval affairs, to consist of sixteen (16) members, six (6) of whom shall be appointed by the speaker, at least one of whom shall be a member of the house of representatives, and at least one of whom shall be a member of the general public; three (3) of whom shall be appointed by the lieutenant governor; two (2) of whom shall be members of the senate, not more than one from the same party, to be appointed by the president of the senate; one of whom shall be a member of the general public appointed by the governor; one of whom shall be the director of the commerce corporation, ex officio or his or her designee; and three (3) of whom shall be naval personnel, appointed by the senior naval officer permanently stationed in Rhode Island. Vacancies shall be filled in like manner as the original appointments. The members of the committee shall, without compensation, serve for two (2) years and until their successors are duly appointed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 105, § 1; P.L. 1975, ch. 182, § 1; P.L. 1979, ch. 358, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 85, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 105, § 7; P.L. 2001, ch. 180, § 63.

30-29-2.
Selection of officers — Staff requirements.

Upon organization of the committee on naval affairs, by majority vote, one of its members shall be chosen as chairperson, another of its members shall be chosen vice chairperson, and another of its members shall be chosen secretary. The director of the commerce corporation shall provide the necessary secretarial and staff assistance as required by the committee.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 105, § 1; P.L. 1979, ch. 358, § 1.

30-29-3.
Duties.

It shall be the duty of the committee on naval affairs to meet from time to time:

To discuss matters of mutual concern to the naval community and the state and to make recommendations to appropriate agencies as to how best to foster and continue a spirit of harmony and cooperation between the naval community and the state;

To review services provided by the state and other agencies to the naval community; and

To make such studies and initiate such other programs in conjunction with the appropriate state departments as may improve the cooperation and programs offered, available, and of concern to the state and its naval community.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 105, § 1; P.L. 1979, ch. 358, § 1.

30-29-4.
Reports and recommendations.

The committee on naval affairs shall, from time to time and at least annually, report to the general assembly on its findings and the results of its activities and shall make such recommendations to the general assembly, and propose such legislation or initiate such studies, as it shall deem advisable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 105, § 1.

30-29-5.
Place of meeting — Quorum.

The committee on naval affairs shall hold its meetings whenever and wherever it will best serve its purposes. A majority of the members of the committee shall be necessary to constitute a quorum for the transaction of business.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 105, § 1.

30-29-6.
Continuation of authority.

The legislative authority for the existence of the permanent committee on naval affairs shall continue until such time as determined by the legislative oversight commission.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 358, § 2.

30-29-7.
Solicitation of funds.

The committee on naval affairs may designate any person or persons to solicit funds for the committee, from the general public, government, or otherwise, in furtherance of the pursuits of the committee. The committee shall designate those persons by vote of the committee and shall supply each person designated with written authorization from the committee allowing them to identify themselves to those solicited. Any person designated by the committee to solicit funds shall give an itemized accounting of all funds collected to the committee.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 105, § 1.